Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 26-18-101.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Disability Policy Provision Law”.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 396; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-396; W.S. 1977, §

26-18-102

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-18-102.
Scope and applicability of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter applies to or affects:

Any policy of liability or worker’s compensation insurance with or without supplementary expense coverage therein;

Any group or blanket policy;

Life insurance, endowment or annuity contracts, or contracts supplemental thereto which contain only those provisions relating to disability insurance as:

Provide additional benefits in case of death or dismemberment or loss of sight by accident or accidental means; or

Operate to safeguard the contracts against lapse, or to give a special surrender value or special benefit or an annuity in case the insured or annuitant is totally and permanently disabled as defined by the contract or supplemental contract.

Reinsurance;

Any contract made or issued prior to January 1, 1968, together with any extensions, renewals, reinstatements or modifications thereof or amendments thereto whenever made.

History.

Laws 1931, ch. 25, § 14; R.S. 1931, § 57-614; C.S. 1945, § 52-715; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-149, 26.1-395; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 395; W.S. 1977, §

26-18-101

; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 26-18-103.
General requirements for policies.

No disability insurance policy shall be delivered or issued for delivery to any person in this state unless it otherwise complies with this code [title 26] and the following:

The entire money and other considerations therefor shall be expressed in the policy;

The time when the insurance takes effect and terminates shall be expressed in the policy;

It shall purport to insure only one (1) person, except that a policy may insure, originally or by subsequent amendment, upon the application of an adult member of a family, who is deemed the policyholder, any two (2) or more eligible members of that family, including husband, wife, dependent children or any children under a specified age not exceeding nineteen (19) years and any other person dependent upon the policyholder;

The style, arrangement and overall appearance of the policy shall give no undue prominence to any portion of the text, and any printed portion of the text and any endorsements or attached papers shall be plainly printed in lightfaced type of a style in general use, the size of which shall be uniform and not less than ten (10) point with a lower case unspaced alphabet length not less than one hundred twenty (120) point;

The “text” shall include all printed matter except the insurer’s name and address, the policy name or title, the brief description, if any, and captions and subcaptions;

The exceptions and reductions of indemnity shall be set forth in the policy and, other than those contained in W.S.

26-18-105

through

26-18-127

, shall be printed, at the insurer’s option, either included with the benefit provision to which they apply or under an appropriate caption such as “Exceptions”, or “Exceptions and Reductions”, except that if an exception or reduction specifically applies to a particular policy benefit, a statement of that exception or reduction shall be included with the benefit provision to which it applies;

Each form, including riders and endorsements, shall be identified by a form number in the lower left-hand corner of the first page;

The policy shall not contain any provision purporting to make any portion of the insurer’s charter, rules, constitution or bylaws a part of the policy unless that portion is set forth in full in the policy, except in the case of the incorporation of or reference to a statement of rates, classification of risks or short-rate table filed with the commissioner;

If issued or delivered on or after January 1, 1999, the policy shall provide a notice on the face of the policy of not less than fourteen (14) point bold type, as to the extent to which the policy includes comprehensive adult wellness benefits as defined in subsection (b) of this section. To insure that the disclosure has been made, the notice shall include space for the signature of the policyholder and the sales representative on the disclosure statement. The disclosure statement must be signed by the applicant and sales representative at the time of the policy application. No policy shall be represented as containing comprehensive adult wellness benefits unless the policy meets the criteria specified under subsection (b) of this section. If coverage is included, the notice shall make reference to the exact location within the policy where the level and extent of coverage is described in detail. If coverage is not included, the notice shall state that the policy does not contain comprehensive adult wellness benefits as defined by law. This statement shall also be placed in a prominent location on any materials used in representing the policy, including sales materials. The department of insurance shall prescribe the form and content of the notice required under this paragraph. This paragraph does not apply to any policy with a deductible of five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) or more.

As used in paragraph (a)(ix) of this section, “comprehensive adult wellness benefits” means benefits not subject to policy deductibles, which provide a minimum benefit equal to eighty percent (80%) of the reimbursement allowance under the private health benefit plan with a maximum of twenty percent (20%) coinsurance by the insured and which provide a benefit structure to the insured equal to a minimum of one hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) per insured adult per calendar year, or a benefit structure of similar actuarial value to the insured. In addition, the benefits shall at minimum provide for testing procedures and for the examination of adult policyholders and their spouses for breast cancer, prostate cancer, cervical cancer and diabetes.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 201, § 2; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-142, 26.1-397; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 397; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1998, ch. 28, § 1.

§ 26-18-104.
Standard policy provisions; substitutions and omissions.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, any policy delivered or issued for delivery to any person in this state shall contain the provisions specified in W.S.

26-18-105

through

26-18-116

, in the words in which the provisions appear, except that with the commissioner’s approval the insurer may substitute for any of the provisions corresponding provisions of different wording which are in each instance not less favorable in any respect to the insured or the beneficiary. Each such provision shall be preceded individually by the applicable caption shown, or, at the insurer’s option, by any appropriate individual or group captions or subcaptions the commissioner approves.

If any provision or part thereof is inapplicable to or inconsistent with the coverage provided by a particular form of policy, the insurer, with the commissioner’s approval, shall omit from the policy the inapplicable provision or part and shall modify any inconsistent provision or part to make the provision as contained in the policy consistent with the coverage the policy provides.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 201, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-143, 26.1-398; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 398; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-18-105.
Policy constitutes entire contract; changes in policy.

“Entire Contract; Changes: This policy, including the endorsements and the attached papers, if any, constitutes the entire contract of insurance. No change in this policy is valid until approved by an executive officer of the insurer and unless the approval is endorsed on or attached to this policy. No agent has authority to change this policy or to waive any of its provisions.”

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 201, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-143, 26.1-399; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 399; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-18-106.
Time limit on certain defenses.

“Time Limit on Certain Defenses: After three (3) years from the date of issue of this policy no misstatements, except fraudulent misstatements, made by the applicant in the application for the policy shall be used to void the policy or to deny a claim for loss incurred or disability, as defined in the policy, commencing after the expiration of the three (3) year period.”

This time limit shall not be so construed as to affect any legal requirement for avoidance of a policy or denial of a claim during the initial three (3) year period, nor to limit the application of W.S.

26-18-118

through

26-18-121

in case of misstatement with respect to age or occupation or other insurance;

A policy which the insured has the right to continue in force subject to its terms by the timely payment of premium until at least age fifty (50) or in the case of a policy issued after age forty-four (44), for at least five (5) years from its date of issue, may contain instead of the “time limit on certain defenses” provision of this section the following provision (from which paragraph (i) of this subsection may be omitted at the insurer’s option) under the caption “Incontestable: After this policy is in force for a period of three (3) years during the insured’s lifetime, excluding any period during which the insured is disabled, it is incontestable as to the statements contained in the application.”

“Except for the preexisting condition provision stated in this subsection, no claim for loss incurred or disability, as defined in the policy, shall be reduced or denied due to a preexisting condition not excluded from coverage by name or specific description effective on the date of loss. This preexisting condition provision shall not exclude coverage for a period beyond twelve (12) months following the individual’s effective date of coverage and shall only relate to conditions for which medical advice, diagnosis, care or treatment was recommended or received during the six (6) months immediately preceding the effective date of coverage or as to a pregnancy existing on the effective date of coverage.”

In determining whether a preexisting condition provision applies to an insured or dependent, all private or public health benefit plans shall credit the time the person was previously covered by a private or public health benefit plan if the previous coverage was continuous to a date not more than ninety (90) days prior to the effective date of the new coverage. In the case of a preexisting conditions limitation allowable in the succeeding carrier’s plan, the level of benefits applicable to preexisting conditions or persons becoming covered by the succeeding carrier’s plan during the period of time this limitation applies under the new plan shall be the lesser of:

The benefits of the new plan determined without application of the preexisting conditions limitation; or

The benefits of the prior plan.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 201, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-143, 26.1-400; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 400; 1983, ch. 190, § 1; 1995, ch. 93, § 2; 1997, ch. 120, § 1.

§ 26-18-107.
Grace period.

“A grace period of . . . . . (insert a number not less than “7” for weekly premium policies, “10” for monthly premium policies and “31” for all other policies) days shall be granted for the payment of each premium falling due after the first premium, during which grace period the policy shall continue in force.”

A policy in which the insurer reserves the right to refuse any renewal shall have at the beginning of the provision specified in subsection (a) of this section: “Unless not less than five (5) days prior to the premium due date the insurer delivers to the insured or mails to his address, as shown by the insurer’s records, written notice of its intention not to renew this policy beyond the period for which the premium has been accepted.”

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 201, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-143, 26.1-401; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 401; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-18-108.
Reinstatement.

“Reinstatement: If any renewal premium is not paid within the time granted the insured for payment, a subsequent acceptance of premium by the insurer or by any agent authorized by the insurer to accept the premium, without requiring an application for reinstatement, reinstates the policy. If the insurer or the agent requires an application for reinstatement and issues a conditional receipt for the premium tendered, the policy shall be reinstated upon the insurer’s approval of the application, or, lacking that approval, upon the forty-fifth day following the date of the conditional receipt unless the insurer previously notified the insured in writing of its disapproval of the application. The reinstated policy covers only loss resulting from an accidental injury sustained after the date of reinstatement and loss due to any sickness beginning more than ten (10) days after that date. In all other respects the insured and insurer have the same rights under the policy as they had immediately before the due date of the defaulted premium, subject to any provisions endorsed on or attached to this policy in connection with the reinstatement. Any premium accepted in connection with a reinstatement shall be applied to a period for which premium has not been previously paid, but not to any period more than sixty (60) days prior to the date of reinstatement.”

The last sentence of the provision in subsection (a) of this section may be omitted from any policy which the insured has the right to continue in force subject to its terms by the timely payment of premiums:

Until at least age fifty (50); or

In the case of a policy issued after age forty-four (44), for at least five (5) years from its date of issue.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 201, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-143; 26.1-402; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 402; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-18-109.
Notice of claim; loss-of-time benefit.

“Notice of Claim: Written notice of claim shall be given to the insurer within sixty (60) days after the occurrence or commencement of any loss covered by the policy, or as soon thereafter as is reasonably possible. Notice given by or on behalf of the insured or the beneficiary to the insurer at . . . . . (insert the location of the office the insurer designates for the purpose), or to any authorized agent of the insurer, with information sufficient to identify the insured, is deemed notice to the insurer.”

In a policy providing a loss-of-time benefit which may be payable for at least two (2) years, an insurer may insert the following between the first and second sentence of the provision specified in subsection (a) of this section: “Subject to the qualifications set forth in this provision, if the insured suffers loss of time because of disability for which indemnity is payable for at least two (2) years, at least once in every six (6) months after having given notice of the claim, he shall give to the insurer notice of continuance of the disability, except in the event of legal incapacity. The period of six (6) months following any filing of proof by the insured or any payment by the insurer because of the claim or any denial of liability in whole or in part by the insurer shall be excluded in applying this provision. Delay in giving the notice does not impair the insured’s right to any indemnity which would otherwise have accrued during the period of six (6) months preceding the date on which the notice is actually given.”

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 201, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-143, 26.1-403; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 403; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Timely filing. —

A dentist timely filed his notice of claim for disability benefits where he (1) sustained an accident which left him with virtually no vision in his left eye and contacted a company to arrange for the sale of his practice, (2) continued to practice dentistry after the accident, with substantially reduced income, until the business was sold several years later, and (3) then submitted a claim for loss of member as well as for disability benefits. Brown v. Life Ins. Co. of N. Am., 8 P.3d 333,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 2000).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Modern status of rules requiring liability insurer to show prejudice to escape liability because of insured's failure or delay in giving notice of accident or claim, or in forwarding suit papers, 32 ALR4th 141.

Policy provision limiting time within which action may be brought on the policy as applicable to tort action by insured against insurer, 66 ALR4th 859.

§ 26-18-110.
Claim forms.

“Claim Forms: The insurer, upon receipt of a notice of claim, will furnish to the claimant the forms it usually furnishes for filing proofs of loss. If the forms are not furnished within fifteen (15) days after giving notice, the claimant is deemed to have complied with the requirements of this policy as to proof of loss upon submitting, within the time fixed in the policy for filing proofs of loss, written proof covering the occurrence, the character and extent of the loss for which claim is made.”

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 201, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-143, 26.1-404; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 404; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-18-111.
Proofs of loss.

“Proofs of Loss: Written proof of loss shall be furnished to the insurer at its office in case of claim for loss for which this policy provides any periodic payment, contingent upon continuing loss within ninety (90) days after the termination of the period for which the insurer is liable, and in case of claim for any other loss within ninety (90) days after the date of the loss. Failure to furnish proof within the time required does not invalidate nor reduce any claim if it is not reasonably possible to give proof within that time, provided the proof is furnished as soon as reasonably possible and, except in the absence of legal capacity, not later than one (1) year from the time proof is otherwise required.”

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 201, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-143, 26.1-405; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 405; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Quoted

in

Brown v. Life Ins. Co. of N. Am., 8 P.3d 333,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 26-18-112.
Time of payment of claims.

“Time of Payment of Claims: Indemnities payable under this policy for any loss, other than loss for which this policy provides any periodic payment, shall be paid immediately upon receipt of written proof of the loss. Subject to written proof of loss, all accrued indemnities for loss for which this policy provides periodic payment shall be paid
. . . . .
(insert period for payment which shall not be less frequently than monthly) and any balance remaining unpaid upon the termination of liability shall be paid immediately upon receipt of written proof.”

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 201, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-143, 26.1-406; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 406; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-18-113.
Payment of claims.

“Payment of Claims: Indemnity for loss of life is payable in accordance with the beneficiary designation and the provisions respecting that payment which may be prescribed in this policy and effective at the time of payment. If no designation or provision is then effective, the indemnity is payable to the insured’s estate. Any other accrued indemnities unpaid at the insured’s death, at the insurer’s option, may be paid either to the beneficiary or to the estate. Any other indemnities are payable to the insured.”

Either or both of the following provisions may be included with the provision specified in subsection (a) of this section at the insurer’s option:

“If any indemnity of this policy is payable to the insured’s estate, or to an insured or beneficiary who is a minor or otherwise not competent to give a valid release, the insurer may pay the indemnity, up to an amount not exceeding $ . . . . . (insert an amount which shall not exceed $1,000), to any relative by blood or connection by marriage of the insured or beneficiary whom the insurer deems to be equitably entitled thereto. Any payment the insurer makes in good faith pursuant to this provision discharges the insurer to the extent of the payment.”

“Subject to the insured’s written direction in the application or otherwise, all or a portion of any indemnities provided by this policy because of hospital, nursing, medical or surgical services, at the insurer’s option and unless the insured requests otherwise in writing not later than the time of filing proofs of the loss, may be paid directly to the hospital or person rendering the services, but it is not required that the service be rendered by a particular hospital or person.”

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 201, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-143, 26.1-407; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 407; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-18-114.
Physical examination and autopsy.

“Physical Examinations and Autopsy: The insurer at its own expense has the right to examine the person of the insured when and as often as it reasonably requires during the pendency of a claim under the policy and to make an autopsy in case of death if it is not forbidden by law.”

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 201, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-143, 26.1-408; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 408; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-18-115.
Legal actions.

“Legal Actions: No action at law or in equity shall be brought to recover on this policy prior to the expiration of sixty (60) days after written proof of loss is furnished in accordance with the requirements of this policy. No such action shall be brought after the expiration of three (3) years after the time written proof of loss is required to be furnished.”

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 201, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-143, 26.1-409; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 409; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Understanding the New Tort of First Party Bad Faith in Wyoming: McCullough v. Golden Rule Insurance Company,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 225 (1991).

§ 26-18-116.
Change of beneficiary.

“Change of Beneficiary: Unless the insured makes an irrevocable designation of beneficiary, the right to change the beneficiary is reserved to the insured, and the consent of the beneficiary is not requisite to the surrender or assignment of this policy or to any change of beneficiary, or to any other changes in this policy.”

The clause relating to the irrevocable designation of beneficiary may be omitted at the insurer’s option.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 201, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-143, 26.1-410; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 410; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-18-117.
Optional policy provisions.

Except as provided in W.S. 26-18-104(b), no disability insurance policy delivered or issued for delivery to any person in this state shall contain provisions as set forth in W.S.

26-18-118

through

26-18-127

unless the wording of those provisions is the same as it appears in the applicable section, except that the insurer may use a corresponding provision of different wording the commissioner approves which is not less favorable in any respect to the insured or the beneficiary. The corresponding provision shall be preceded individually by the appropriate caption or, at the insurer’s option, by appropriate individual or group captions or subcaptions the commissioner approves.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 411; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-411; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-18-118.
Change of occupation.

“Change of Occupation: If the insured is injured or becomes ill after having changed his occupation to one the insurer classifies as more hazardous than that stated in this policy or while doing for compensation anything pertaining to an occupation so classified, the insurer shall pay only that portion of the indemnities provided in this policy as the premium paid would have purchased at the rates and within the limits fixed by the insurer for the more hazardous occupation. If the insured changes his occupation to one the insurer classifies as less hazardous than that stated in this policy, the insurer, upon receipt of proof of the change of occupation, shall reduce the premium rate accordingly, and shall return the excess pro rata unearned premium from the date of change of occupation or from the policy anniversary date immediately preceding receipt of the proof, whichever is more recent. In applying this provision, the classification of occupational risk and the premium rates shall be those the insurer last filed, prior to the occurrence of the loss for which the insurer is liable or prior to date of proof of change in occupation, with the state official having supervision of insurance in the state where the insured resided at the time this policy was issued. If the filings specified were not required, then the classification of occupational risk and the premium rates shall be those the insurer last made effective in that state prior to the occurrence of the loss or prior to the date of proof of change in occupation.”

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 201, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-143, 26.1-412; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 412; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-18-119.
Misstatement of age.

“Misstatement of Age: If the insured’s age is misstated, all amounts payable under this policy shall be such as the premium paid would have purchased at the correct age.”

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 201, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-143, 26.1-413; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 413; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-18-120.
Overinsurance; same insurer.

“If any accident or sickness or accident and sickness policy previously issued by the insurer to the insured is in force concurrently with this policy, making the aggregated indemnity for
. . . . .
(insert type of coverage or coverages) in excess of $ . . . . .
(insert maximum limit of indemnity or indemnities), the excess insurance is void and all premiums paid for the excess shall be returned to the insured or to his estate.” or, instead: “Insurance effective at any one time on the insured under this policy and a like policy in this insurer is limited to one (1) policy the insured, his beneficiary or his estate elects, and the insurer shall return all premiums paid for the other policies.”

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 201, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-143, 26.1-414; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 414; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-18-121.
Overinsurance; all coverages.

“Overinsurance: If, with respect to a person covered under this policy, benefits for allowable expense incurred during a claim determination period under this policy together with benefits for allowable expense during that period under all other valid coverage, without giving effect to this provision or to any ‘overinsurance provision’ applying to the other valid coverage, exceed the total of the person’s allowable expense during the period, this insurer is liable only for the proportionate amount of the benefits for allowable expense under this policy during the period as:

The total allowable expense during the period bears to:

The total amount of benefits payable during the period for the expense under this policy and all other valid coverage, without giving effect to this provision or to any ‘overinsurance provision’ applying to the other valid coverage; less

In this paragraph any amount of benefits for allowable expenses payable under other valid coverage which does not contain an overinsurance provision.

The provisions of subsection (a) of this section do not operate to increase the amount of benefits for allowable expense payable under this policy with respect to a person covered under this policy above the amount which would have been paid in the absence of these provisions. This insurer may pay benefits to any insurer providing other valid coverage in case of overpayment by the insurer. Any such payment discharges this insurer’s liability as fully as if the payment is made directly to the insured, his assignee or his beneficiary. If this insurer pays benefits to the insured, his assignee or his beneficiary, exceeding the amount payable if the existence of other valid coverage had been disclosed, this insurer has a right of action against the insured, his assignee or his beneficiary to recover the amount which would not have been paid had there been a disclosure of the existence of other valid coverage. The amount of other valid coverage which is on a provision of service basis shall be computed as the amount the services rendered would have cost in the absence of that coverage.

For the purpose of the provisions in subsections (a) and (b) of this section:

‘Allowable expense’ means one hundred ten percent (110%) of any necessary, reasonable and customary item of expense which is covered, in whole or part, as a hospital, surgical, medical or major medical expense under this policy or under any other valid coverage;

‘Claim determination period’ with respect to any covered person means the initial period of . . . . . (insert period of not less than thirty days) and each successive period of a like number of days, during which allowable expense covered under this policy is incurred because of that person. The first period begins on the date when the first expense is incurred, and successive periods begin when an expense is incurred after expiration of a prior period, or, instead: ‘Claim determination period’ with respect to any covered persons means . . . . . (insert calendar or policy period of not less than a month) during which allowable expense covered under this policy is incurred because of that person;

‘Overinsurance provision’ means this provision and any other provision which may reduce an insurer’s liability because of the existence of benefits under other valid coverage.”

The policy provisions specified in subsections (a) through (c) of this section may be inserted in all policies providing hospital, surgical, medical or major medical benefits. The insurer may make this provision applicable to either or both other valid coverage with other insurers and other valid coverage with the same insurer. The insurer shall include in this provision a definition of “other valid coverage” approved as to form by the commissioner. The term may include hospital, surgical, medical or major medical benefits provided by group, blanket or franchise coverage, individual and family-type coverage, Blue Cross-Blue Shield coverage and other prepayment plans, group practice and individual practice plans, uninsured benefits provided by labor-management trusteed plans, or union welfare plans, or by employer or employee benefit organizations, benefits provided under governmental programs, worker’s compensation insurance or any coverage required or provided by any other statute, and medical payments under automobile liability and personal liability policies. Other valid coverage does not include payments made under third party liability coverage as a result of a determination of negligence, but an insurer may include a subrogation clause in its policy. As part of the proof of claim, the insurer may require the information necessary to administer this provision.

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 201, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-143, 26.1-415; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 415; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no paragraph (a)(ii) of this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Self-insurance against liability as “other insurance” within meaning of liability insurance policy, 46 ALR4th 707.

§ 26-18-122.
Relation of earnings to insurance.

“After the loss-of-time benefit of this policy has been payable for ninety (90) days, that benefit shall be adjusted, as provided in this section, if the total amount of unadjusted loss-of-time benefits provided in all valid loss-of-time coverage upon the insured exceeds . . . . . % of the insured’s earned income. However, if the information contained in the application discloses that the total amount of loss-of-time benefits under this policy and under all other valid loss-of-time coverage expected to be effective upon the insured in accordance with the application for this policy exceeded . . . . . % of the insured’s earned income at the time of the application, the higher percentage shall be used in the place of . . . . . %. The adjusted loss-of-time benefit under this policy for any month shall be only that proportion of the loss-of-time benefit otherwise payable under this policy as:

The product of the insured’s earned income and . . . . . % or, if higher, the alternative percentage described at the end of the first sentence of this provision bears to;

The total amount of loss-of-time benefits payable for that month under this policy and all other valid loss-of-time coverage on the insured, without giving effect to the overinsurance provision in this or any other coverage; less

In both paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection any amount of loss-of-time benefits payable under other valid loss-of-time coverage which does not contain an ‘overinsurance provision’.

In making the computation specified in subsection (a) of this section, all benefits and earnings shall be converted to a consistent (insert ‘weekly’ if the loss-of-time benefit of this policy is payable weekly, ‘monthly’ if the benefit is payable monthly, etc.) basis. If the numerator of the ratio obtained in the computation in subsection (a) of this section is zero or is negative, no benefit is payable under this policy. This provision does not operate to:

Reduce the total combined amount of loss-of-time benefits for the month payable under this policy and all other valid loss-of-time coverage below the lesser of three hundred dollars ($300.00) and the total combined amount of loss-of-time benefits determined without giving effect to any ‘overinsurance provision’;

Increase the amount of benefits payable under this policy above the amount which would have been paid in the absence of this provision; nor

Take into account or reduce any benefit other than the loss-of-time benefit.

For the purpose of subsections (a) and (b) of this section:

‘Earned income’, unless otherwise specified, means the greater of the monthly earnings of the insured at the time disability commences and his average monthly earnings for a period of two (2) years immediately preceding the commencement of that disability and does not include any investment income or any other income not derived from the insured’s vocational activities;

‘Overinsurance provision’ includes this provision and any other provision with respect to any loss-of-time coverage which may have the effect of reducing an insurer’s liability if the total amount of loss-of-time benefits under all coverage exceeds a stated relationship to the insured’s earnings.”

The provisions of subsections (a) through (c) of this section may be included only in a policy providing a loss-of-time benefit which is payable for at least fifty-two (52) weeks, which is issued on the basis of selective underwriting of each individual application and for which the application includes a question designed to elicit information necessary either to determine the ratio of the total loss-of-time benefits of the insured to the insured’s earned income or to determine that the ratio does not exceed the percentage of earnings, not less than sixty percent (60%), the insurer selects and inserts instead of the blank factor specified in this section. As part of the proof of claim, the insurer may require the information necessary to administer this provision. If the application indicates that other loss-of-time coverage is to be discontinued, the amount of the other coverage shall be excluded in computing the alternative percentage in the first sentence of the overinsurance provision.

The policy shall include a definition of “valid loss-of-time coverage”, which the commissioner approves as to form. The definition may include:

Coverage provided by:

Governmental agencies; and

Organizations subject to regulation by insurance law and by insurance authorities of this or any other state of the United States or of any other country or subdivision thereof.

Coverage provided for the insured pursuant to:

Any disability benefits statute; or

Any worker’s compensation or employer’s liability statute.

Benefits provided by labor-management trusteed plans, union welfare plans, employer or employee benefit organizations or by salary continuance or pension programs; and

Any other coverage the inclusion of which the commissioner approves.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 416; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-416; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-18-123.
Unpaid premiums.

“Unpaid Premiums: Upon the payment of a claim under this policy, any premium then due and unpaid or covered by any note or written order may be deducted from the amount of the claim paid.”

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 201, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-143, 26.1-417; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 417; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-18-124.
Conformity with state statutes.

“Conformity with State Statutes: Any provision of this policy which, on its effective date, is in conflict with the statutes of the state in which the insured resides on that date is amended to conform to the minimum requirements of those statutes.”

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 201, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-143, 26.1-418; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 418; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-18-125.
Illegal occupation.

“Illegal Occupation: The insurer is not liable for any loss to which a contributing cause is the insured’s commission of or attempt to commit a felony or to which a contributing cause is the insured’s engaging in an illegal occupation.”

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 201, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-143, 26.1-419; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 419; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

§ 26-18-126.
Intoxicants and narcotics.

“Intoxicants and Narcotics: The insurer is not liable for any loss sustained or contracted because of the insured’s being intoxicated or under the influence of any narcotic unless administered on the advice of a physician.”

History.

Laws 1953, ch. 201, § 3; W.S. 1957, §§ 26-143, 26.1-420; Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 420; 1983, ch. 190, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability insurance: intoxication or other mental incapacity avoiding application of clause in liability policy specifically exempting coverage of injury or damage caused intentionally by or at direction of insured, 33 ALR4th 983.

§ 26-18-127.
Renewability.

Disability insurance policies, other than accident insurance only policies, in which the insurer reserves the right to refuse renewal on an individual basis, shall provide in substance in a provision in the policy or in an endorsement thereon or rider attached thereto that:

Subject to the right to terminate the policy upon nonpayment of premium when due, the right to refuse renewal may not be exercised so as to take effect before the renewal date occurring on, or after and nearest, each policy anniversary (or in the case of lapse and reinstatement, at the renewal date occurring on, or after and nearest, each anniversary of the last reinstatement); and

Any refusal of renewal is without prejudice to any claim originating while the policy is in force.

The insurer may omit the parenthetic reference to lapse and reinstatement in paragraph (a)(i) of this section.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 421; W.S. 1957, § 26.1-421; Laws 1983, ch. 190, § 1.